Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF129.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 145.4718, is amended to read: 145.4718 PROGRAM EVALUATION. (a) The director of child sex trafficking prevention established under section 145.4716 must conduct, or contract for, comprehensive evaluation of the statewide program for safe harbor for sexually exploited youth. The deleted text begin first evaluation must be completed by June 30, 2015, and must be submitteddeleted text end new text begin director must submit an updated evaluationnew text end to the commissioner of health new text begin and to the chairs and ranking minority members of the senate and house of representatives committees with jurisdiction over health and public safety new text end by September 1deleted text begin , 2015, and every two years thereafterdeleted text end new text begin of each odd-numbered yearnew text end . The evaluation must consider whether the program is reaching intended victims and whether support services are available, accessible, and adequate for sexually exploited youth, as defined in section 260C.007, subdivision 31. (b) In conducting the evaluation, the director of child sex trafficking prevention must consider evaluation of outcomes, including whether the program increases identification of sexually exploited youth, coordination of investigations, access to services and housing available for sexually exploited youth, and improved effectiveness of services. The evaluation must also include examination of the ways in which penalties under section 609.3241 are assessed, collected, and distributed to ensure funding for investigation, prosecution, and victim services to combat sexual exploitation of youth.